District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.14

Relation to federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 467; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(a) ) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 114, 53 DCR 1652
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.